Washington statutes.
RCW 35.37.050

Excess indebtedness—Authority to contract.

Every city and town may, when authorized by the voters of the city or town pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution at an election held pursuant to RCW 39.36.050, contract indebtedness or borrow money for strictly municipal purposes on the credit of the city or town and issue negotiable bonds therefor in an amount which when added to its existing indebtedness will exceed the amount of indebtedness authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred without the assent of the voters but will not exceed the amounts of indebtedness authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred with the assent of the voters.

[ 1984 c 186 s 16; 1965 c 7 s 35.37.050. Prior: (i) 1891 c 128 s 2; RRS s 9539. (ii) 1891 c 128 s 4, part; RRS s 9542, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Validation—1969 ex.s. c 191: "Any city or town, which has prior to the effective date of this act [April 25, 1969], submitted to the voters thereof for their ratification or rejection the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of negotiable bonds in an amount when added to its existing indebtedness will exceed the amount of indebtedness authorized to be incurred without the assent of the voters, but will not exceed the amount of indebtedness authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred with the assent of the voters, may incur such indebtedness and issue such bonds even though the amount of money desired to be borrowed and the amount of negotiable bonds to be issued therefor were stated in a resolution adopted by the city or town council submitting such proposition to the voters, instead of in an ordinance passed by such council, if all other requirements of law, including, but not limited to the other provisions of RCW 35.37.050 are complied with." [ 1969 ex.s. c 191 s 1.]